Illinois, session 104th, SB1810.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 52-3.200 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.200)7    Sec. 2-3.200. State Board of Education literacy 8assistance.9    (a) The State Board of Education shall adopt and make 10available all of the following to each publicly funded school 11district by July 1, 2024:12        (1) A rubric by which districts may evaluate curricula 13    and select and implement evidence-based, culturally 14    inclusive core reading instruction programs aligned with 15    the comprehensive literacy plan for the State described in 16    subsection (c).17        (2) A template to support districts when developing 18    comprehensive, district-wide literacy plans that include 19    support for special student populations, including, at a 20    minimum, students with disabilities, multilingual 21    students, and bidialectal students.22        (3) Guidance on evidence-based practices for effective 23    structures for training and deploying literacy coaches to   SB1810- 2 -LRB104 03300 LNS 13322 b1    support teachers and close opportunity gaps among student 2    demographic groups.3    (b) On or before January 1, 2025, the State Board of 4Education shall develop and make available training 5opportunities for educators in teaching reading that are 6aligned with the comprehensive literacy plan described in 7subsection (c), supportive of Black English language learners, 8and consistent with State learning standards. This support may 9include:10        (1) the development of a microcredential or a series 11    of microcredentials in literacy instruction aligned with 12    the comprehensive literacy plan described in subsection 13    (c) to be affixed to educator licenses upon successful 14    demonstration of the skill or completion of the required 15    coursework or assessment, or both, or online training 16    modules on literacy instruction, aligned with the 17    comprehensive literacy plan described in subsection (c) 18    and consistent with State learning standards, accepted for 19    continuing professional development units; and20        (2) the creation and dissemination of a tool that 21    school districts, educators, and the public may use to 22    evaluate professional development and training programs 23    related to literacy instruction ; and .24        (3) the creation of an online portal to train 25    educators in teaching Black English language learners and 26    Black English as a second language. The portal shall aid   SB1810- 3 -LRB104 03300 LNS 13322 b1    educators in teaching students accustomed to using the 2    African American English vernacular, aid educators in 3    teaching about the history and development of African 4    American English vernacular, and include evidence-based 5    methods in teaching literacy to these students accustomed 6    to African American English vernacular. 7    (c) In consultation with education stakeholders, the State 8Board of Education shall develop and adopt a comprehensive 9literacy plan for the State on or before January 31, 2024. The 10comprehensive literacy plan shall consider, without 11limitation, evidence-based research and culturally and 12linguistically sustaining pedagogical approaches to meet the 13needs of all students and shall, at a minimum, do all of the 14following:15        (1) Consider core instructional literacy practices and 16    practices related to the unique needs of and support for 17    specific student populations, including, at a minimum, 18    students with disabilities, multilingual students, and 19    bidialectal students, and the resources and support, 20    including professional learning for teachers, needed to 21    effectively implement the literacy instruction. 22        (2) Provide guidance related to screening tools, the 23    administration of such screening tools, and the 24    interpretation of the resulting data to identify students 25    at risk of reading difficulties in grades kindergarten 26    through 2. This guidance shall outline instances in which   SB1810- 4 -LRB104 03300 LNS 13322 b1    dyslexia screenings and other universal screeners are 2    appropriate for use with English learners.3        (3) Provide guidance related to early literacy 4    intervention for students in grades kindergarten through 2 5    for schools to implement with students at risk of reading 6    difficulties, as well as literacy intervention for 7    students in grades 3 through 12 demonstrating reading 8    difficulties.9        (4) Consider the impact of second language acquisition 10    and bilingual education on reading instruction in the 11    student's native language and English. 12        (5) Define key terminology, such as "evidence-based". 13        (6) Contextualize the interaction between elements of 14    the plan and existing laws and regulations that have 15    overlapping components, such as a multi-tiered system of 16    support. 17        (7) Focus on a comprehensive range of elements of 18    literacy, including phonological awareness; decoding 19    (phonics); encoding (spelling); vocabulary development, 20    including morphology, oracy, and reading fluency; and 21    reading comprehension, including syntax and background and 22    content knowledge. 23(Source: P.A. 103-402, eff. 7-28-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.